Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB259.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "child sexual abuse material" in section 6312(g) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended October 29, 2024 (P.L.1095, No.125), is amended to read:§ 6312. Sexual abuse of children.* * *(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:* * *"Child sexual abuse material." Any of the following:(1) A book, magazine, pamphlet, slide, photograph, film, videotape, computer depiction or other material depicting a 123456789101112131415161718 child under 18 years of age engaging in a prohibited sexual act or in the simulation of a prohibited sexual act.(2) As follows:(i) the lewd exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of an unclothed, partially clothed or clothed child under 18 years of age in a patently offensive or sexually suggestive manner;(ii) material which the average person applying contemporary community standards would find that the subject matter taken as a whole appeals to the prurient interest in sex; and(iii) material which the subject matter, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, educational or scientific value.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0259PN0205 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516